Massachusetts, session 194th, H5267.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall 
be created a 9 member Advisory Commission to investigate the scope, scale and environmental 
impact of sand mining in Massachusetts.The Commission shall consist of the following members 
or their designees: one member from the Executive Office of the Secretary of Energy and 
Environmental Affairs with an expertise in geographic information systems (GIS); two members, 
one appointed by the President of the Senate and one appointed by the Speaker of the House of 
Representatives, with knowledge of ecology, ecosystems, forestry or biodiversity; one 
representative from the Community Land & Water Coalition; one representative from the 
Conservation Law Foundation, one expert in hydrology nominated by the University of 
Massachusetts and appointed by the Governor; and one Indigenous person appointed by the 
Mashpee Wampanoag Tribe, the Herring Pond Wampanoag Tribe and the Aquinnah 
Wampanoag Tribe. The Commission shall be chaired by the Secretary of the Executive Office of 
Energy and Environmental Affairs or their designee.  

of 2 14  b) The panel shall serve in an advisory capacity only and shall meet monthly or more 
frequently in public meetings to study sand mining in the Commonwealth including 1) the 
current and potential impact on drinking water; 2) the impact on air pollution including worker 
and public exposure to respirable crystalline silica from sand mines; 3) the impact on 
Environmental Justice communities and Indigenous history and culture; 4) climate change 
mitigation and resilience. 
c) Said investigation shall conclude within two years of this legislation’s passage into law 
and it shall include recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes to protect drinking 
water, air quality, worker and public health, and the ecology and environment. Said changes may 
include changes to licensing laws for mining, Part I, Title II, Chapter 21B, Section 5 of the 
General Laws.